Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 33.3. Colorado Common Interest Ownership Act

Editor’s note:

The provisions of this act are based substantially on the “Uniform Common Interest Ownership Act”, as promulgated by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws. Colorado did not adopt article 4 concerning protection of purchasers and the optional article 5 of said uniform act concerning administration and registration of common interest communities.

Law reviews:

For article, “

C

olorado

C

ommon Interest Ownership Act - How it is Doing”, see 25 Colo. Law. 17 (Nov. 1996); for article, “When the Developer Controls the Homeowner Association Board: The Benevolent Dictator?”, see 31 Colo. Law. 91 (Jan. 2002); for article, “S.B. 05-100 and 06-089--Impact on Colorado’s Common Interest Communities”, see 35 Colo. Law. 57 (Dec. 2006); for article, “When Homeowner Associations Borrow What Attorneys and Lenders Should Know”, see 44 Colo. Law. 51 (Dec. 2015); for article, “Construction Defect Municipal Ordinances: The Balkanization of Tort and Contract Law (Part 3)”, see 46 Colo. Law. 27 (Apr. 2017); for article, “Mitigating Potential Condo Conversion and Renovation Construction Defect Liabilities: Part 1”, see 48 Colo. Law. 28 (Apr. 2019); for article, “Condominium Obsolescence: The Final Act or a New Beginning?”, see 49 Colo. Law. 42 (Jan. 2020); for article, “A Block of Blue Sky, Small Planned Communities in Colorado”, see 49 Colo. Law. 53 (Dec. 2020).